src-fst-morphology-affixes-numerals.lexc.md
# Meänkieli numerals 

From fin via fkv.

# Numeral inflection
Numeral inflection is like nominal, except that numerals compound in all
forms which requires great amount of care in the inflection patterns.

* Numeral nominative back examples:*
* *kaksi:* `kaksi+Num+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # two)
* *kaks:* `kaksi+Num+Sg+Nom`

* Numeral nominative front examples:*
* *yksi:* `yksi+Num+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # one)
* *yks:* `yksi+Num+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # one)

* Numeral nominative plural back examples:*
* *kahet:* `kaksi+Num+Pl+Nom`

* Numeral nominative plural front examples:*
* *yhet:* `yksi+Num+Pl+Nom`

* Numeral weak singular back examples:*
* *kahen:* `kaksi+Num+Sg+Gen`
* *kahela:* `kaksi+Num+Sg+Ade`
* *kahelta:* `kaksi+Num+Sg+Abl`
* *kahele:* `kaksi+Num+Sg+All`
* *kahessa:* `kaksi+Num+Sg+Ine`
* *kahesta:* `kaksi+Num+Sg+Ela`
* *kaheksi:* `kaksi+Num+Sg+Tra`
* *kahetta:* `kaksi+Num+Sg+Abe`

* Numeral weak singular front examples:*
* *yhen:* `yksi+Num+Sg+Gen`
* *yhelä:* `yksi+Num+Sg+Ade`
* *yheltä:* `yksi+Num+Sg+Abl`
* *yhele:* `yksi+Num+Sg+All`
* *yhessä:* `yksi+Num+Sg+Ine`
* *yhestä:* `yksi+Num+Sg+Ela`
* *yheksi:* `yksi+Num+Sg+Tra`
* *yhettä:* `yksi+Num+Sg+Abe`

* Numeral strong singular back examples:*
* *kahtena:* `kaksi+Num+Sg+Ess`

* Numeral strong singular front examples:*
* *yhtenä:* `yksi+Num+Sg+Ess`

* Numeral weak plural back examples:*
* *kaksila:* `kaksi+Num+Pl+Ade`
* *kaksilta:* `kaksi+Num+Pl+Abl`
* *kaksile:* `kaksi+Num+Pl+All`
* *kaksissa:* `kaksi+Num+Pl+Ine`
* *kaksista:* `kaksi+Num+Pl+Ela`
* *kaksiksi:* `kaksi+Num+Pl+Tra`
* *kaksitta:* `kaksi+Num+Pl+Abe`

* Numeral weak plural front examples:*
* *yksilä:* `yksi+Num+Pl+Ade`
* *yksiltä:* `yksi+Num+Pl+Abl`
* *yksile:* `yksi+Num+Pl+All`
* *yksissä:* `yksi+Num+Pl+Ine`
* *yksistä:* `yksi+Num+Pl+Ela`
* *yksiksi:* `yksi+Num+Pl+Tra`
* *yksittä:* `yksi+Num+Pl+Abe`

* Numeral weak plural back strong examples:*
* *kaksina:* `kaksi+Num+Pl+Ess`
* *kaksine:* `kaksi+Num+Pl+Com`

* Numeral weak plural back strong examples:*
* *kaksina:* `kaksi+Num+Pl+Ess`
* *kaksine:* `kaksi+Num+Pl+Com`

* Numeral weak plural front strong examples:*
* *yksinä:* `yksi+Num+Pl+Ess`
* *yksine:* `yksi+Num+Pl+Com`

* Numeral weak plural front strong examples:*
* *yksinä:* `yksi+Num+Pl+Ess`
* *yksine:* `yksi+Num+Pl+Com`

* Numeral singular partitive a examples:*
* *kaheksee:* `kaheksen+Num+Sg+Par` (Eng. !eight)

* Numeral singular partitive a poss aan examples:*
* *kolmee:* `kolme+Num+Sg+Par` (Eng. !three)

* Numeral singular partitive ta examples:*
* *kuutta:* `kuusi+Num+Sg+Par` (Eng. !six)

* Numeral singular partitive tä examples:*
* *viittä:* `viisi+Num+Sg+Par` (Eng. !five)

* Numeral singular illative an examples:*
* *kaheksheen:* `kaheksen+Num+Sg+Ill`

* Numeral singular illative en back examples:*
* *kolmheen:* `kolme+Num+Sg+Ill`

* Numeral singular illative en front examples:*
* *viitheen:* `viisi+Num+Sg+Ill`

* Numeral singular illative en front examples:*
* *neljään:* `neljä+Num+Sg+Ill`

* Numeral singular illative in back examples:*
* *miljardhiin:* `miljardi+Num+Sg+Ill` (Eng. !billion)

* Numeral plural partitive ia examples:*
* *kaksii:* `kaksi+Num+Pl+Par`

* Numeral plural partitive ja examples:*
* *miljardii:* `miljardi+Num+Pl+Par`

* Numeral plural genitive ien back examples:*
* *kaksien:* `kaksi+Num+Pl+Gen`

* Numeral plural genitive ien front examples:*
* *neljien:* `neljä+Num+Pl+Gen`

* Numeral plural genitive ten back examples:*
* *kuussiin:* `kuusi+Num+Pl+Gen`
* *kuutten:* `kuusi+Num+Pl+Gen` (Eng. !kuussiin on tärkeämpi)

* Numeral plural genitive ten front examples:*
* *viissiin:* `viisi+Num+Pl+Gen`
* *viitten:* `viisi+Num+Pl+Gen` (Eng. !viissiin on tärkeämpi)

* Numeral plural genitive in back examples:*

* Numeral plural genitive in front examples:*

* Numeral plural illaive ihin bavk examples:*
* *miljardhiin:* `miljardi+Num+Pl+Ill`

* Numeral plural illaive iin back examples:*
* *kakshiin:* `kaksi+Num+Pl+Ill`

* Numeral possessive back examples:*
* *kahteni:* `kaksi+Num+Sg+Nom+PxSg1` (Eng. !Kainun kielessä possessiivisuffiksiita käytethään aika vähän. Annamme niiden olla täällä toistaiseksi.)

* Numeral possessive front examples:*
* *yhteni:* `yksi+Num+Sg+Nom+PxSg1`

* Numeral possessive back aan examples:*
* *kolmeensa:* `kolme+Num+Sg+Par+PxSg3`

* Numeral possessive back eenback examples:*
* *kaheksensa:* `kaksi+Num+Sg+Tra+PxSg3`
* *kahekseen:* `kaksi+Num+Sg+Tra+PxSg3`

* Numeral possessive back een front examples:*
* *neljeksensä:* `nelje+Num+Sg+Tra+PxSg3`
* *neljekseen:* `nelje+Num+Sg+Tra+PxSg3`

* Numeral possessive back ään examples:*
* *viittänsä:* `viisi+Num+Sg+Par+PxSg3`
* *viittään:* `viisi+Num+Sg+Par+PxSg3`

* Numeral clitic back examples:*
* *kaksihan:* `kaksi+Num+Sg+Nom+Foc/han`
* *kakshan:* `kaksi+Num+Sg+Nom+Foc/han`

* Numeral clitic front examples:*
* *yksihän:* `yksi+Num+Sg+Nom+Foc/han`
* *ykshän:* `yksi+Num+Sg+Nom+Foc/han`

* **LEXICON ARABICCASES**  adds +Arab

* **LEXICON ARABICCASE**  adds +Arab

* **LEXICON ARABICCASE0**  adds +Arab

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-fit/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc)</small>
